th: สูตรดินเหนียวอบในเตาอบ: ดินโพลิเมอร์แบบยืดหยุ่น; ดินโพลิเมอร์แบบเหลว; ดินโพลิเมอร์; ดินโพลิเมอร์เอฟเฟกต์พอร์ซเลน; ดินเรซิน; ดินโพลิเมอร์แบบโปร่งแสง; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 烤箱烘烤软陶配方: 柔性聚合物黏土; 液体聚合物黏土; 聚合物黏土; 瓷效聚合物黏土; 树脂黏土; 半透明聚合物黏土; 其他
pt-BR: Argila de forno formulação: Argila de polímero flexível; Argila de polímero líquida; Argila de polímero; Cerâmica plástica com efeito de porcelana; Argila de resina; Cerâmica plástica translúcida; Outros
ja: オーブン焼成粘土配合: フレキシブルポリマークレイ; リキッドポリマークレイ; ポリマークレイ; 磁器調ポリマークレイ; 樹脂粘土; 半透明ポリマークレイ; その他
fi: Uunissa kovettuvan massan koostumus: Joustava polymeerisavi; Nestemäinen polymeerisavi; Polymeerisavi; Posliiniefektinen polymeerisavi; Hartsisavi; Kuultava polymeerisavi; Muu
sk-SK: Receptúra hliny určenej na vypaľovanie v rúre: Flexibilná polymérová hlina; Tekutá polymérová hlina; Polymérová hlina; Polymérová hlina s porcelánovým efektom; Živicová hlina; Priesvitná polymérová hlina; Iné
sl-SI: Sestava mase za modeliranje s peko v pečici: Prožna polimerna glina; Tekoča polimerna glina; Polimerna glina; Polimerna glina z učinkom porcelana; Smolnata glina; Prosojna polimerna glina; Drugo
fr: Formulation de l’argile à cuire au four: Pâte polymère flexible; Pâte polymère liquide; Pâte polymère; Pâte polymère effet porcelaine; Pâte de résine; Pâte polymère translucide; Autre
pl: Formuła glinki do wypieku w piecu: Elastyczna glina polimerowa; Płynna glina polimerowa; Glina polimerowa; Glina polimerowa z efektem porcelany; Glina żywiczna; Półprzezroczysta glina polimerowa; Inne
de: Zusammensetzung des ofenhärtenden Tons: Flexible Polymerton; Flüssiger Polymerton; Polymerton; Polymerton mit Porzellaneffekt; Harzton; Transluzenter Polymerton; Sonstige
bg-BG: Формула на глина за изпичане във фурна: Гъвкава полимерна глина; Течна полимерна глина; Полимерна глина; Полимерна глина с порцеланов ефект; Смолиста глина; Прозираща полимерна глина; Друго
en: Oven-bake clay formulation: Flexible polymer clay; Liquid polymer clay; Polymer clay; Porcelain-effect polymer clay; Resin clay; Translucent polymer clay; Other
sv: Formulering för ugnsbakad lera: Flexibel polymerlera; Flytande polymerlera; Polymerlera; Polymerlera med porslinseffekt; Hartslera; Halvgenomskinlig polymerlera; Övrigt
tr: Fırında pişirilen kil formülasyonu: Esnek polimer kil; Sıvı polimer kil; Polimer kil; Porselen görünümlü polimer kil; Reçine kili; Yarı saydam polimer kil; Diğer
hr-HR: Formulacija gline pečene u pećnici: Fleksibilna polimerna glina; Tekuća polimerna glina; Polimerna glina; Polimerna glina s efektom porculana; Glina od smole; Poluprozirna polimerna glina; Ostalo
vi: Công thức đất sét nung trong lò: Đất sét polymer dẻo; Đất sét polymer lỏng; Đất sét polymer; Đất sét polymer hiệu ứng sứ; Đất sét resin; Đất sét polymer trong mờ; Khác
lt-LT: Orkaitėje kepamo molio formulė: Lankstus polimerinis molis; Skystas polimerinis molis; Polimerinis molis; Porceliano efekto polimerinis molis; Dervos molis; Pusiau skaidrus polimerinis molis; Kita
ru: Формула запекаемой глины: Гибкая полимерная глина; Жидкая полимерная глина; Полимерная глина; Полимерная глина с эффектом фарфора; Смоляная глина; Полупрозрачная полимерная глина; Другое
pt-PT: Fórmula de barro para cozedura em forno: Argila de polímero flexível; Argila de polímero líquida; Argila de polímero; Argila de polímero com efeito de porcelana; Argila de resina; Argila de polímero translúcida; Outra
ro-RO: Formula argilei cu coacere în cuptor: Argilă polimerică flexibilă; Argilă polimerică lichidă; Argilă polimerică; Argilă polimerică cu efect de porțelan; Argilă din rășină; Argilă polimerică translucidă; Altele
hu: Sütőben kiégethető gyurma összetétele: Rugalmas polimer agyag; Folyékony polimer agyag; Polimer agyag; Porcelánhatású polimer agyag; Gyanta agyag; Fényáteresztő polimer agyag; Egyéb
zh-TW: 烤箱烘烤黏土配方: 軟陶; 液態軟陶; 聚合黏土; 仿瓷聚合黏土; 樹脂黏土; 半透明聚合黏土; 其他
nl: Ovenbakklei formulering: Flexibele polymeerklei; Vloeibare polymeerklei; Polymeerklei; Polymeerklei met porseleineffect; Harsklei; Lichtdoorlatende polymeerklei; Overige
it: Formula di argilla da cuocere in forno: Argilla polimerica flessibile; Argilla polimerica liquida; Argilla polimerica; Argilla polimerica effetto porcellana; Argilla di resina; Argilla polimerica traslucida; Altro
cs: Receptura z hlíny vypálené v peci: Pružná polymerová hmota; Tekutá polymerová hmota; Polymerová hmota; Polymerová hmota s porcelánovým efektem; Pryskyřičná hmota; Průsvitná polymerová hmota; Ostatní
nb: Leiresammensetning for ovnsbaking: Fleksibel polymerleire; Flytende polymerleire; Polymerleire; Polymerleire med porselenseffekt; Resinleire; Gjennomskinnelig polymerleire; Annet
da: Formulering af ovnhærdende ler: Fleksibelt polymerler; Flydende polymerler; Polymerler; Polymerler med porcelænseffekt; Resinler; Gennemskinneligt polymerler; Andet
el: Σύνθεση αργίλου που ψήνεται σε φούρνο: Εύκαμπτος πολυμερικός πηλός; Υγρός πολυμερικός πηλός; Πολυμερικός πηλός; Πολυμερικός πηλός με εφέ πορσελάνης; Πηλός ρητίνης; Ημιδιαφανής πολυμερικός πηλός; Άλλο
es: Formulación de arcilla para hornear: Arcilla polimérica flexible; Arcilla polimérica líquida; Arcilla polimérica; Arcilla polimérica efecto porcelana; Arcilla de resina; Arcilla polimérica translúcida; Otra
ko: 오븐 소성 점토 배합: 유연한 폴리머 클레이; 액상 폴리머 클레이; 폴리머 클레이; 포셀린 효과 폴리머 클레이; 레진 클레이; 반투명 폴리머 클레이; 기타